Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-483.01
National Driver Register; employer check; fee.

An employer may apply to the Department of Motor Vehicles for a file check from the National Driver Register on a current or prospective employee. The employer shall pay a fee of two dollars for each check. Upon receipt of the application and fee, the department shall furnish the check to the employer and remit the fees to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund.

Laws 1995, LB 467, § 8.